test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_izhichigewin_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewinenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishiniibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishiniibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishiniibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
